Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-230
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Trust Company Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Agency capacity means a capacity resulting from a trust company undertaking to act alone or jointly with others primarily as agent for another in all matters connected with its undertaking, including the capacities of registrar, paying agent, or transfer agent with respect to stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness of any corporation, association, municipality, state, or public authority, escrow agent, or agent for the investment of money or any other similar capacity;

(2) Branch trust office means an office of a trust company, other than the main or principal office of a trust company, at which a trust company may act in any fiduciary capacity or conduct any activity permitted under the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(3) Fiduciary capacity means a capacity resulting from a trust company undertaking to act alone or jointly with others primarily for the benefit of another in all matters connected with the undertaking and includes the capacities of trustee, including trustee of a common trust fund, administrator, personal representative, guardian of an estate, conservator, receiver, attorney in fact, and custodian and any other similar capacity;

(4) Representative trust office means an office at which a trust company does not act in any fiduciary capacity or conduct or engage in any activity related to its fiduciary capacities but may otherwise engage in any other activity permitted under the Nebraska Trust Company Act; and

(5) Trust company means any trust company which is incorporated under the laws of this state, any national banking association having its principal office in this state and authorized to conduct a trust company business as defined in the Nebraska Trust Company Act, any bank authorized to conduct a trust company business in a trust department pursuant to sections 8-159 to 8-162, any federal savings association authorized to conduct a trust company business, and any federally chartered trust company.

Laws 1977, LB 338, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 49;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 51.